ipjsua/Classes/View Contollers/Applications/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015/Adobe Photoshop CC 2015.app/Contents/Required/Linguistics/Providers/Plugins2/AdobeHunspellPlugin.bundle/Contents/SharedSupport/Dictionaries/fi_FI/hyph_fi_FI.dic
UTF-8
% ADOBE CONFIDENTIAL
% ___________________
%
%  Copyright ©2011 Adobe Systems Incorporated
%  All Rights Reserved.
%
% NOTICE:  All information contained herein is, and remains
% the property of Adobe Systems Incorporated and its suppliers,
% if any.  The intellectual and technical concepts contained
% herein are proprietary to Adobe Systems Incorporated and its
% suppliers and are protected by trade secret or copyright law.
% Dissemination of this information or reproduction of this material
% is strictly forbidden unless prior written permission is obtained
% from Adobe Systems Incorporated.
%
% Version 1.0.1
%
LEFTHYPHENMIN 2
RIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDLEFTHYPHENMIN 2
COMPOUNDRIGHTHYPHENMIN 2
NOHYPHEN -,',’
1-1
1'1
1’1
NEXTLEVEL
.a2
.asi3al1li
.a2sia
.a1si
.asial1l
.asi3a1na
.alu3ee2n1s
.a1lu
.auke3aa
.au1ke
.k2
.koko3elmat
.1ko
.ko1ko
.kokoe2l1m
.kokoel1ma
.koi3r
.kovi3e
.ko1v
.kunti3e
.1ku
.kun1t
.kun1ti
.kuva3uksen
.ku1v
.kuvauk1s
.kuvauk1se
.o2
.osta3es
.o2s1t2
.os1ta
.ovi1e
.o1v
.s2
.seksu3
.1se
.sek1s
.suunti3e
.suun1t
.suun1ti
.e2
.ei3
.lapsi3e
.1la
.lap1s
.lap1si
.lo1mi1
.leikka3us
.lei2k1k
.leik1ka
.lu3ettelos
.1lu
.lue2t1t
.luet1te
.luette1lo
.lu3etteloi
.lu3ettelot
.i2
.i1ki1
.2no1p
.t2
.talo3u2t1t
.1ta
.ta1lo
.ta1lou
.talo3udes
.talou1d
.tapa3ukset
.ta1pa
.tapauk1s
.tapauk1se
.histo1ri4
.1hi
.hi2s1t2
.his1to
.u2
.ä2
.valti3oi1d
.1v
.val1t
.val1ti
.vuo1ti3
.y2
.b2
.p2
.peli3e
.pe1li
.1f2
.1g2
2a.
aa1o2
aa3si
aasi3aa
aa2sia
aasi3a2s1t2
aa1e
aa1le
2aal1l
aalia2
aa1li
4aalisen
aali1se
aali3e
aa1i
aan1o2
aa3ni
aa1ri1e
a2a1ri
aa1b
1aka2sy
a1ka
aka2nan
aka1na
aka3u2s.
akka3uk
a2k1k
ak1ka
akki3aa
ak1ki
akou4
a1ko
akti3ot
a2k1t
ak1ti
ak3r
ak4ri
a1k4ru
ao2
a1o2s1s
a1ol
a1oh
a1o1j
a1o1v
a1op
aoppi3e
ao2p1p
aop1pi
a1sa
as1a2se
a2s1a1j
aska3us
a2s1k
as1ka
a1so
as2oi
assi1e
a2s1s
as1si
asemi3e
a1se
ase1mi
a2sia
a1si
1a2sio
asi1e
astaji3e
a2s1t2
as1ta
asta1j
ast3i2kä
as1ti
a1sä
as1ym
a1sy
asyö2p
a1eh
a1e2d
a1e2v
a1er
a1lo
alehti4e
a1leh
aleh1t
aleh1ti
ali3a2s1t2
a1li
ali1ol
ali1on
ali1oh
a1lä
aike3al
ai1ke
aike3am1pi
aikea2mp
aike3uksii
aikeuk1s
aikeuk1si
a1i2kä
ai1o1ta
ai1om
ai2sas
ai1sa
ai1so
a1i2sie
ai1si
a1isä
ai1e1ta
ailevi3
ai1le
aile1v
ai1u
an1a2la
a1na
ananvapa3us
anan1v
ananva1pa
ana2tu
1a2n1a2j
a2n1ar
ano1aa
a3nee
a1ne
a2n1eh
an1i2s1k
a1ni
a2nih
anni3as
an1n
an1ni
3antunte1v
an1t
an1tu
an1tun1t
antun1te
3antuntijaa
antun1ti
antunti1j
3antuntijan
3antuntijat
3antuntijar
anvapa3u2t1t
an1v
anva1pa
atalo3u2s
a1ta
ata1lo
ata1lou
atami3e
ata1mi
atappi3on
ata2p1p
atap1pi
ato3ami2s1t2
a1to
atoa1mi
ato1ri1
at1sa1u
a2t1s
atsi1e
at1si
ate1a
a1te
ateo2
ati1aa
a1ti
atia2
ati3a2s.
ati3a2s1t2
ati1al
ati1an
ati1oi
ati3o2n.
ati3o2t.
atta1u
a2t1t
at1ta
attoma2s4s
at1to
atto1ma
3atterio
at1te
atte1ri
atuksi3aa
a1tu
atuk1s
atuk1si
atu2s
atu1e
at1yh
a1ty
1a2h2o.
a1ho
ajo1aa
a1j
ajo1e
4amman
a2m1m
am1ma
amä1e2
a1mä
au1aa
auka1u
au1ka
au1o
au1l
au3n
autuvi3
au1tu
autu1v
a1uu
a1ä
ava3u2s.
a1v
avoimi3e
avoi1mi
avä1
a1yk
a1yh
ayhte3y
ayh1t
ayh1te
ara3ukse2t.
a1ra
arauk1s
arauk1se
ara1us
a1ro
2a1ri
ari3a2a.
a1ria
ari1oh
aruo2
a1ru
arva3us
ar1v
ab1r
apa3ukse2s1t2
a1pa
apauk1s
apauk1se
apa3u2s1t2
a1pe
a3pi
a3pi1a
a1pä
ap3ri
ap2r
agi2
a1g
a1co
a1x
a1z
2k.
1ka
ka2sy
ka1le
ka1no
ka3us1ta
kau2s1t2
kau2ma
kau1m
2k1k
kka3ukset
k1ka
kkauk1s
kkauk1se
kke1aa
k1ke
k2k1e2n.
kke3uk1si
kkeuk1s
kke3u2s.
kkeu2s1
kkie2
k1ki
kki1es
kku3ess2a.
k1ku
kkue2s1s
kkä1ys
k1kä
1ko
ko1sa
kos1ki1
ko2s1k
ko1lo
ko3ma
ko1u2s1k
kortti3e
kor1t
kor2t1t
kort1ti
ko1p
kopi3oi
ko1pi
kopi3o2t.
k1s
ks2o
ksi1o
k1si
1ke
ke3as3taa
kea2s1t2
keas1ta
ke1o
ke1lä
ke1i2kä
ke1iä
kenki3e2n.
ken1k
ken1ki
ke1no
ket1tu2
ke2t1t
kemi3an
ke1mi
kemi3e2n.
ke3uksen
keuk1s
keuk1se
ke1us1v
keu2s1
ke1ro
ke1ri
ke1p
2k2l
1ki
ki1a2a.
ki3ai
ki1a2n.
ki1at
ki1ar
ki1os
kiol2
ki1oh
ki1so
ki1elä
ki1lo
kin1as
ki1na
ki3nu
ki2ö
kipe3ää
ki1pe
k1n
2k1t
kti1oi
k1ti
k1h
k2j
k1m
1ku
kua2
ku1as
ku1ai
ku1os
ku1sa
kustaji3
ku2s1t2
kus1ta
kusta1j
ku3sy
ku1ee
ku1lo
ku1no
kute1o
ku1te
kuvi1e
ku1v
ku1p
1kä
kä1li1
kä1i2k
kä3yksiä
käyk1s
käyk1si
kä1y2s1t2
kä1ri1e
kä1ri
1ky
ky1sa2
ky3li
ky2l
ky3lä
1kö
kö1ää
k2r
k3r2a.
k1ra
k3ra1u
kristi3a2
kri2s1t2
kris1ti
1k1ru
2o.
o1a2se
o1a2sia
oa1si
o1asu
oa2l
o1a1la
oa3li
o1aik
o1ain
o1an1l
o1a2j
o1a2mia
oa1mi
o1ar
okoi3
o1ko
oko3ukse2s1t2
okouk1s
okouk1se
1oksa
ok1s
oke1as
o1ke
oki1al
o1ki
o3ku
okuva3us
oku1v
oo1sa
oo1su
os1a2la
osa2n3ot
osa1no
1osat
osoike3u2s1
os1oik
osoi1ke
oso2t
osi1ko1ko3
o1si
osi1ko
osi3ot2a.
osio1ta
osi1u
ostaji3e
o2s1t2
os1ta
osta1j
ostavi3e
osta1v
osu1e
os1ur
o1sä
o3elmaa
oe2l1m
oel1ma
o3elmas
o3elmal
o3el1mi
o1e2n1s
o3ettua
oe2t1t
oet1tu
o1eh
o1em
oe2r
1oloa
oleik1ka3
olei2k1k
oll3e2i.
ol1l
olu3ees
o1lu
olu4eel
olu3een
olu3ee2t.
olu1ei
olu1en
olu3e2t1t
olu1pa1
olu1p
o1lä
oi4sin1k
oi1si
3oistuimel
oi2s1t2
ois1tu
oistui1me
o1isä
oitta3ess2a.
oi2t1t
oit1ta
oittae2s1s
oittaji4e
oitta1j
oivi1e
oi1v
o2n1ar
o1na
on1ki2
on1k
o1no
1on1sy
o2n1s
o3ne
one1y
on1li2
on1l
oni3a2a.
o1ni
o2niik
o2niu
onta1lo3
on1t
on1ta
onjo1e
on1j
o3nu
o2näk
o1nä
onä1ö
on4g2r
on1g
ottaji3e
o2t1t
ot1ta
otta1j
ottu1e
ot1tu
otuo2
o1tu
otu1e
ohu1en
o1hu
ojatie2
o1j
oja1ti
o2mai
o1ma
ome1as
o1me
omi1aa
o1mi
ompi1e
o2mp
om1pi
o3uksessaa
ouk1s
ouk1se
oukse2s1s
o1us1n
o1usvä
ous1v
oun2
oun1g1
ou4mu
ou1m
o1uu
o3udellis1te
ou1d
oudel1l
oudel1li
oudelli2s1t2
o1ä
ode2
o1d
o3d2r
oval1ti3
o1v
oval1t
ovi1o
o1y2
oyh1ti4
oyh1t
o1ro
o1ri
ori3a2n.
o1ria
orja3us
or1j
o1be
o3po
2o1peu
ope3udel
opeu1d
2oper
opi3o2n.
o1pi
o2pi2s1k
o3pä
ofi1e
o1f
o1g2
o3g1l
ogi3an
oc2
o1w
o1x
2s.
saati4on
saa1ti
saati3ot
saaji3e
saa1j
sa2se
sa3sen
sasi3at
sa2sia
sa1si
1sa1le
s1a2lu1
s2ais
sa1ih
sa3na
sa1no
sa2jo
sa1j
saji1e
sa2me
1sau
3sar1j
s1ar1v
3sa1b
1sa1f
sa1c
2s1k
1s2o.
so1a2l
s1osa
1soe
so1lo
s1ole
s1oik
soike3uksis
soi1ke
soikeuk1s
soikeuk1si
1so3ne
1so1ni
1so1d
1sor
sormi3e2n.
sor1m
sor1mi
1so1f
2s1s
ssi1ol
s1si
1se
se1aa
se3as1ti
sea2s1t2
se1ai
se1an
se3am1ma
sea2m1m
se3ampaa
sea2mp
seam1pa
se1os
se1oi
se1on
se1ot
se1so
se1lo
se1län
sen1o
se1pä
2s1l
1si
3s2i.
si3aka2s.
sia1ka
si3allin
sial1l
sial1li
si1ar
sio2s
1si1o1si
si3ol1la
siol1l
sio3m
si2siä
si1si
si1sä
si2no
sin4s2p
si2n1s
2s1ih1m
si1ra2
s1n
snie2mi
s1ni
2s1t2
sta1lo3u
s1ta
sta1lo
stai4se1na
stai1se
sta3ukset
stauk1s
stauk1se
sta3uksis
stauk1si
ste1y
s1te
sti1os
s1ti
stimi3e
sti1mi
stuomio3
s1tu
stuo1mi
stäji3e
s1tä
stä1j
st3ro
s2tr
s2hi
sjohtaji3e
s1j
sjoh1t
sjoh1ta
sjohta1j
s1m
1su.
su1a2l
1suo
s1u2s1k
susi1e
su1si
1sul
su1lo
su2ni
1suh
su2hi
2s1uh1r
1sä1a2
1sä1ky
1sä1o2
sä1en
säe2
1sä1lu
1säi
1sät
1sää
1säva
sä1v
1säy
1sär
1sä1b
1sä1p
svoimi3e
s1v
svoi1mi
1sy
sy3le
sy2l
sy3li
2s1yh
1sö
s1r
sradi3on
s1ra
sra1d
sryh1mi3
s1ry
sryh1m
s1b2
s1p
s2por
s2p3l
spuo1lu3
s1pu
spöy2
s1pö
e1aal
e1a2k1t
ea1lu1
e1an1p
e1avaa
ea1v
ekoko3ukses
e1ko
e1ko1ko
ekokouk1s
ekokouk1se
ekoko3uksee
ekevi1
e1ke
eke1v
e1o2s1k
e1os1te
eo2s1t2
eo3ta
e1oh
eori1o
eo1ri
e1ope
e1sa
e1s1au
es1os
e2sit
e1si
esta3us
e2s1t2
es1ta
esti3e
es1ti
3estön1k
es1tö
e1su
e1sä
e2sy
eek1si1
eek1s
ee3si
een1o
ee2nin
ee1ni
ee1r
elkki3e2
el1k
el2k1k
elk1ki
e1le
eli1o
e1li
3elil1la
elil1l
elimi3e
eli1mi
1elmao2
e2l1m
el1ma
3elma1tu
elmi3e
el1mi
4elmii
1eläm
e1lä1p
e1lö
ei1so
e2nal
e1na
en1a2la
e2n1ai
en1a2j
e1noi
eno2m
en1o1ma
enope1
e2nop
3ennäises
en1n
en1nä
ennäi1se
1entos
en1t
en1to
en2tor
ente1o
en1te
e2n1äit
e1nä
e2n1äi1d
e2n1yr
e1ny
eta1lo1
e1ta
eto3ava
e1to
etoa1v
ete1ok
e1te
ete1ol
ettomas4
e2t1t
et1to
etto1ma
3etteloo
et1te
ette1lo
3ettelo2s1t2
etä2mi
e1tä
et2ro
e2tr
eho1aa
e1ho
ema1ri3e
e1ma
em2a1ri
e2mellä
e1me
emel1l
emuksi3aa
e1mu
emuk1s
emuk1si
emä1e2
e1mä
emyksi3ää
e1my
emyk1s
emyk1si
eu1a
e3uksellis
euk1s
euk1se
euksel1l
euksel1li
eu2s1
e1usa
e1us1ko
eu2s1k
e1u2s1s
e1u2s1l
e1u1si
e1us1ti
eu2s1t2
e1usjä
eus1j
e1us1p
eu1l
eu1n
eutuvi3e
eu1tu
eutu1v
e1uu
e4uden
eu1d
eä1sa
e3älli2s1t2
eäl1l
eäl1li
e2du
e1d
1edut
e2d3r
eve1ys1
e1v
e1yk
eyksi3e
eyk1s
eyk1si
eys1
e1ysa2
e1ys1ki
ey2s1k
e1y2s1t2
e1ydet
ey1d
e1yr
eri3a2s1s
e1ria
erä1y
e1rä
eryh1mi3
e1ry
eryh1m
e1be
eb1r
e1po
e1pe
e1p1hi
ep2h
ep3r
efe1
e1f
egi1an
e1g
e1c
e3ci
2l.
1la
laatu3aa
laa1tu
laaji3e
laa1j
la1o2
la3si
la1su
laji1e
la1j
la1uk1s
la3u2s1t2
2lab
l1k
lkki1o
l2k1k
lk1ki
lke3äs1tä
l1ke
lkeä2s1t2
lke3ä2n.
lkukoi2
l1ku
lku1ko
lo1sa
lo2s2l
2lo1su
1loe
1lou
lou2s
lo3us1tu
lou2s1t2
lo3utee2n.
lou1te
1lo1d
1lo1v
1lop
lo1pe
1lo1g2
2ls
l1sa
l1so
l3s2te
l2s1t2
l1sä
1le.
1lea
le1aa
le1a2n1s
1les
1lel
le4nik
le1ni
1leh
lehti3e
leh1t
leh1ti
3le1j
le1äk
le1ri
leri3aa
le1ria
leri3an
1lep
le1pä
l1l
lli1ai
l1li
1li
3l2i.
li2aat
li1al1l
li1a2lu1
li1aja
lia2j
li1ar
li1ok1s
li1o2la
li1o2p
li2sa
li3saa
li1so
lis1si1
li2s1s
li1säk
li1säs
li1sän
li1e2s1s
li1el
li4eh
li2na2
li3na2s1t2
lin1an
lin1a1j
lin1a1v
li3nop
li1no
limaa3i
li1ma
limel4la
li1me
limel1l
li1us
3liä
li1y
l1t
ltavas4
l1ta
lta1v
lti2a2
l1ti
lti3an
lti3oille
ltioil1l
lttä1e2
l2t1t
lt1tä
ltäji1
l1tä
ltä1j
ltävi3e
ltä1v
l1h
2l1m
lma2lu
l1ma
lmi1on
l1mi
1lu
lu3ava2n.
lua1v
lu1ar
lu1sa
lu3ettu1j
lue2t1t
luet1tu
lumo1a
lu1m
lu1mo
lu1p
3lä.
3läs
1läl
1ly
ly2n
ly1n1e
ly4ni
ly1n1y
lös1
l1r
l1b
l1p
2l1q
2i.
i1aal
i1aat
i1aar
i3akas1ta
ia1ka
iaka2s1t2
i1a2k1k
ia1o2
i1a2s1k
i1as1si
ia2s1s
i1a1se
i1a2sia
ia1si
iasi3al
iasi3an
i1as1te
ia2s1t2
ia1e
i1a2lu
i1aih
i1ai1d
ia1noa
i1anno
ian1n
i1an1ta
ian1t
ia1te1
ia2j
iamai2
ia1ma
i1au
i1a2v
i1ar1v
ia1p
ikaupunki3a
i1ka
ikau1pu
ikaupun1k
ikaupun1ki
ikoi2r
i1ko
ik2s3e2n.
ik1s
ik1se
ike3ampaa
i1ke
ikea2mp
ikeam1pa
i2k3l
ikymmeni3e
i1ky
iky2m1m
ikym1me
ikymme1ni
i1k2r
i1osa
i1oso
io1e
i1o1la
i1ole
i3olli1se
iol1l
iol1li
iolu1e
io1lu
ioi1ke1
i3oita1v
ioi1ta
i3oitta3e
ioi2t1t
ioit1ta
i3oittamin
ioitta1mi
i1o3naa
io1na
io2no
iotie4
io1ti
io3tu
i1o1j
io2p
io3pa
i1ope
io2g3
i1sa
i3s2a.
is1a2se
is1a1si
i3sal
i3san
is1a2v
iski3en
i2s1k
is1ki
isi1oo
i1si
isi1o2s
isi1ot
isi2vui
isi1v
3istuin1t
i2s1t2
is1tu
3istuimen
istui1me
3istuimet
is2ho
i1su
isu1aa
i2s1ur
i2s1ym
i1sy
ie1a2
i1e2sit
ie1si
i1elim
ie1li
ie1no
i4e2n1s
ie1n1to
ien1t
ie1n1v
i1em1ma
ie2m1m
i3emmi2s1t2
iem1mi
i3emmin1k
i1e2mp
iempi3e
iem1pi
ie3d
ie1ro
ie1ri
ilaina3u
i1la
ilai1na
ila3u2s.
i1le
ili1an
i1li
ili1e
i1lä
i1lö
ii1ak
ii1an1p
ii1oit
iisi1e
ii1si
ii1lo
ii2no
iin1os
iittäväs4
ii2t1t
iit1tä
iittä1v
ii1ri1e
ii1ri
ina3la
i1na
ina3u2s1t2
i1no
i3noi
i2n1o2m
in1ope
i2nop
in2o1pe3u
in4s2p
i2n1s
inti3en
in1t
in1ti
intyvi3e
in1ty
inty1v
ita1e
i1ta
ita1lo3u
ita1lo
itapa3u
ita1pa
ito3u2t1t
i1to
ite1o
i1te
iti1os
i1ti
itta3essan
i2t1t
it1ta
ittae2s1s
ittaji3e
itta1j
ittavi3e
itta1v
ittomi3e
it1to
itto1mi
i1th2
itusoi1ke3
i1tu
itus1oik
iji1e
i1j
imaa2i
i1ma
imai2no
ima1u
imerkki3e2
i1me
imer2k1k
imerk1ki
imus1
i1mu
imä1e2
i1mä
iu1s2a
iu1s1i
iutuvi3
iu1tu
iutu1v
i1uh
i1uu
i1ään3k
ide1an
i1d
ivalti3on
i1v
ival1t
ival1ti
ivä1e2
i1yh1ti
iyh1t
i1yh1d
i1ös
i1öl1j
i1öi
i1ön
i2r2a.
i1ra
ira3uksia
irauk1s
irauk1si
i1ro
iro1si2
i1ri
ir1tu1
ir1t
i1be
ipa2ni
i1pa
i1po
i1pe
i1pä
i1p2r
i2g
i3ga
i3ge
i3gi
i1co
2n.
1na
3n2a.
3naa
na1k3r
2n1a2se
na1e2
na2la
3nal1l
2na1ly
2n1aik
3nais
2n1aih
nan1o
nata1lo3
na1ta
na1u2s1k
nava1u
na1v
navi1e
2nar
3n2a1ri1
3nap
n1k
n2k3l
nk1ti1
n2k1t
n2k3r
nk4ri
1n2o.
no1a2l
1noo
nosa2
n1oso
1no2s1s
no2sil
no1si
1n2o2s1t2
no1el
1nol
nologi4a
no1lo1g2
noi1ke1
noikeuksi3e
noikeuk1s
noikeuk1si
1n2on
no1n1o
1no2t.
no2to
3no1j
nomi1e
no1mi
1nou
2nop
nope3aan
no1pea
nope3u2s1
n2o1peu
nope3utt2a.
nopeu2t1t
nopeut1ta
2n1s
n3s2ki
n2s1k
nsi3oit
n1si
nsi1on
ns2p
1ne
ne1lo
4n1elä
neim1pi3
nei2mp
ne3no
ne3uden1h
ne4uden
neu1d
2n1e1d
nedustaji3e
ne2du
nedu2s1t2
nedus1ta
nedusta1j
neyh1ti3
neyh1t
ne1ro
ne1ri
2n1e2rä
n1l
1ni
3n2i.
ni1ai
ni1an1n
ni1o2s1s
ni3oni2n.
nio1ni
ni1o2t.
ni1or
ni1so
2n1isä
2n1i2l1m
n1ih1m
3nimet
ni1me
ni1us
n1n
n3n2a
nno3to
n3n2e
n3nu
n1t
ntalo3u2s
n1ta
nta1lo
nta1lou
ntaji3e2n.
nta1j
nta1us
nta2y
nte1at
n1te
ntelevi3e
nte1le
ntele1v
nterve3
nter1v
nti1as
n1ti
ntia2
nti1an
ntuo2j
n1tu
ntärke3ää
n1tä
ntär1ke
n1h
nja1u
n1j
n1m
nme1n
n1me
1nu
nu2s1
nusa2
2nu2s1k
2nuh
1nä
2näit
2näi1d
n2d3s
n1d
n3dri
n2d2r
nval1ti3
n1v
nval1t
1ny
2n1yh
1nöi
3nöö1rin
nöö1ri
3nöörit
n1r
n1b
n1p
ng1ia
n1g
n3gy
n1c
2t.
1ta
3taa
taaji3e
taa1j
taavi3e
taa1v
ta1os
tao2
ta1oi
